Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-687
Violation; penalty.

Any person who withdraws or transfers ground water in violation of the Industrial Ground Water Regulatory Act shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. Each day shall constitute a separate offense in cases of continued violation.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 13;

Laws 1986, LB 309, § 5.